Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1056
Stakeholder, defined.

Stakeholder means a public safety answering point, a public safety agency, and any person, organization, agency of government, originating service provider, or other organization that has a vital interest in the 911 service system.

Laws 2016, LB938, § 24;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-1024;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 38.